Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Licensing.

Sec. 08.26.010.
License required; exception.

Except as provided by (b) of this section or AS

08.26.180

, a person may not engage in the business of providing services as a private professional guardian or conservator unless the person has a license issued under this chapter.

An individual may be appointed and provide services as a private professional guardian or conservator without a license issued under this chapter and receive compensation approved by a court as long as the individual does not act as a guardian or conservator for more than one person or two people who are related to each other up to and including the fourth degree of consanguinity, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption, computed under the rules of civil law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For renewal of license, see AS

08.01.100

.

Sec. 08.26.020.
Requirements for private professional full and partial guardian licenses.

The department shall issue a private professional full guardian license to an individual

who is at least 21 years of age;

who has two or more years of professional client casework experience or at least an associate degree in human services, social work, psychology, sociology, gerontology, special education, or a closely related field;

who is certified as a guardian by a nationally recognized organization in the field of guardianships;

whose criminal history record checks under AS

08.26.070

show that the individual has not been convicted of a felony or of a misdemeanor offense in the state or in any other jurisdiction involving fraud, misrepresentation, material omission, misappropriation, theft, conversion, or any other crime the department determines would affect the individual’s ability to provide the services of a guardian competently and safely for the protected person within 10 years before the application;

who satisfies the application requirements of AS

08.26.060

; and

who satisfies the requirements for obtaining a private professional conservator license under AS

08.26.030

.

The department shall issue a private professional partial guardian license to an individual who satisfies the requirements under (a)(1) — (5) of this section. A licensed private professional partial guardian may not perform conservator services.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004; am §§ 3, 4 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.26.030.
Requirements for private professional conservator license.

The department shall issue a private professional conservator license to an individual

who is at least 21 years of age;

who has obtained a high school diploma, or a general education development diploma or its equivalent;

who has six months’ employment experience in a position involving financial management, or has at least an associate degree in accounting or a closely related field;

who is certified as a guardian by a nationally recognized organization in the field of guardianships;

whose criminal history record checks under AS

08.26.070

show that the individual has not been convicted of a felony or of a misdemeanor offense in the state or in any other jurisdiction involving fraud, misrepresentation, material omission, misappropriation, theft, conversion, or any other crime that the department determines would affect the individual’s ability to provide the services of a conservator competently and safely for the protected person within 10 years before the application; and

who satisfies the application requirements of AS

08.26.060

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.26.040.
Requirements for organizational license. [Repealed, § 31 ch 53 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 08.26.050.
Temporary license.

The department shall issue a temporary license to an individual under AS

08.26.020

or

08.26.030

who

is not certified by a nationally recognized organization in the field of guardianships at the time of the application but is likely to become certified within one year from the date of the license, and otherwise satisfies the licensing requirements of AS

08.26.020

or

08.26.030

; and

satisfies the application requirements of AS

08.26.060

.

If the individual with a temporary license under (a) of this section submits proof of certification by a nationally recognized organization in the field of guardianships within one year from the date of the issuance of the temporary license, the department shall issue the individual a license under AS

08.26.020

or

08.26.030

without requiring a new application.

A temporary license issued under this section may not be renewed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Sec. 08.26.060.
Application requirements.

To apply for a license under this chapter, a person shall submit an application on a form provided by the department and submit

two complete fingerprint cards containing fingerprints and other information required by the Department of Public Safety to obtain state and national criminal history record information under AS 12.62 and AS 12.64;

a written waiver of confidentiality signed by the applicant allowing the department to access at any time relevant complaint information made about the applicant to adult protective services, the designated protection and advocacy agency, the long term care ombudsman, or an entity that certifies or licenses private professional guardians or private professional conservators;

a written statement signed by the applicant that the applicant will allow immediate access at any time to the department to the file of a ward or protected person and to financial information regarding the applicant, including corporate or other business records; and

payment of the application fee, any criminal history record information checks fee charged under AS

12.62.160(d)

, and any other fees required by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 6 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.26.070.
Criminal history record information checks.

For each applicant for a license under this chapter, the department shall submit the fingerprint cards and other relevant information received with the application to the Department of Public Safety and request the Department of Public Safety to

submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record information check on the applicant;

perform a state criminal history record information check on the applicant; and

provide the department with the results of the criminal history record information checks made under (1) and (2) of this subsection.

The department may not issue a license to a person under this section unless the department receives the report required by (a)(3) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004)